Hawaii statutes.
[§6E-45 Korean and Vietnam
memorial.] The memorial to the veterans of the Korean and Vietnam
conflicts shall be constructed on the Ewa lawn of the state capitol among the
trees near the Richards Street border, bounded on one side by the covered
stairway (with appropriate setback), Richards Street (with appropriate
setback), and Beretania Street (with appropriate setback). The height of the
memorial shall not exceed twenty feet, keeping in proportion with other
statuary located in the immediate area. The design of the memorial shall
utilize the natural assets of the site, with secluded areas of wall and trees
for purposes of remembrance and meditation. [L 1992, c 323, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next